Vermont, session 2025-2026, H50.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 29 V.S.A. § 165 is amended to read:
§ 165. SPACE ALLOCATION, INVENTORY, AND USE; LEASING
PROPERTY; COMMISSIONER’S PREAPPROVAL REQUIRED
* * *
(e) The Commissioner of Buildings and General Services shall maintain an
inventory of all State-owned or State-leased buildings and land and shall
biannually annually compile and update the information received under
subsection (g) of this section, which shall be considered once available in
making spacing allocations and designating uses under subsection (c) of this
section.
* * *
(g) The head of each agency shall prepare and forward to the
Commissioner of Buildings and General Services when requested by the
Commissioner annually in a format prescribed by the Commissioner an
inventory of: square footage available for use; square footage in actual use;
square footage not in use; square footage used for storage; square footage that
is unfinished; cost per square foot for rent; cost per square foot for operation
and maintenance; and the source of funds for rent, operation, and maintenance,
including the act and section numbers of a legislative directive if applicable.
VT LEG #388672 v.1

No. 79 Page 2 of 3
2026
The head of each agency shall additionally indicate in its inventory in a format
prescribed by the Commissioner whether any building is vacant and whether
any land is unnecessary for State purposes.
* * *
(j) On or before January 15 of each new legislative biennium, the
Commissioner shall submit to the House Committee on Corrections and
Institutions and the Senate Committee on Institutions the inventory maintained
under subsection (e) of this section.
Sec. 2. INVENTORY OF PARCELS FOR HOUSING DEVELOPMENT;
2026–2030; REPORT
(a) As part of the inventory that a head of an agency conducts pursuant to
29 V.S.A. § 165(g) through calendar year 2030, the head of the agency shall
identify and report to the Department of Housing and Community
Development each parcel under its ownership that meets all of the screening
criteria developed by the Department for Executive Order No. 06-25 (3 App.
V.S.A. ch. 10, § 51).
(b) On or before January 15 of each legislative session through calendar
year 2031, the Commissioner of Housing and Community Development shall
provide to the House Committee on Corrections and Institutions and the Senate
Committee on Institutions the inventory of properties identified pursuant to
subsection (a) of this section, a list of those inventoried properties the
VT LEG #388672 v.1

No. 79 Page 3 of 3
2026
Commissioner determines may be suitable for housing development, and an
explanation of the Commissioner’s determination.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
Date Governor signed bill: April 6, 2026
VT LEG #388672 v.1